Connecticut, session 2026, SB00047.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That title 12 of the general statutes be amended to establish a personal
income tax deduction of up to twenty-five thousand dollars for the
amount of tips or gratuities declared by a taxpayer employed in an
occupation listed by the Internal Revenue Service as customarily and
ordinarily receiving tips.